Wyoming, session 2026, HB0117.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

(a) The legislature finds that:
HB0117

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0445

(i) Informed consent is foundational to medical
treatment decisions. Some informed consent challenges are
universal to medicine, while other challenges are specific
to the practice of obstetrics and gynecology compared to
other specialty areas;

(ii) It is essential to the psychological and
physical well-being of a woman considering an abortion that
the woman receives complete and accurate information on
abortion and its alternatives;

(iii) The decision to have an abortion "is an
important, and often a stressful one, and it is desirable
and imperative that it be made with full knowledge of its
nature and consequences." Planned Parenthood v. Danforth,
428 U.S. 52, 67 (1976);

(iv) Adequate and legitimate informed consent
includes information that relates "to the consequences to
the fetus." Planned Parenthood v. Casey, 505 U.S. 833, 882
(1992), overruled by Dobbs v. Jackson Women's Health Org.,
597 U.S. 215, 231, 302 (2022);
HB0117

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0445

(v) A patient cannot agree to medical treatment
unless the patient is competent, adequately informed and
not coerced into giving informed consent;

(vi) Many women are coerced into having
abortions. A 2017 study on women's abortion experiences
reported that seventy-three and eight‑tenths percent (73.8%)
of women said that they "disagreed that their decision to
abort was entirely free from even subtle pressure from
others to abort." Priscilla Coleman et al., Women Who
Suffered Emotionally from Abortion: A Qualitative Synthesis
of their Experiences, 22 J. Am. Physicians & Surgeons 113,
115 (2017);

(vii) A 2023 national study found that over
sixty percent (60%) of women who had abortions reported
experiencing high levels of pressure to abort from one (1)
or more sources. David C. Reardon et al., Effects of
Pressure to Abort on Women's Emotional Responses and Mental
Health, Cureus (Jan. 31, 2023).

HB0117

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0445
(b) It is the purpose of this act to ensure that a
woman who is harmed by the performance of an elective
abortion may bring a civil action against any person who
performs the abortion in situations where the harm was due
to negligent, reckless or intentional conduct, voluntary
informed written consent was not given or the abortion
provider knew or should have known that the interested
party was coerced into the abortion. The legislature
declares that women deserve the right to seek and recover
damages from the person who performed an abortion in these
circumstances that resulted in harm to the woman.

Section 2. W.S. 35-6-401 through 35-6-403 are created
to read:

35-6-401. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(i) "Abortion-inducing drug" means a medicine,
drug or other substance prescribed or dispensed with the
intent of terminating the clinically diagnosable pregnancy
of a woman, with knowledge that the termination will, with
HB0117

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0445
reasonable likelihood, cause the death of the unborn child.
"Abortion-inducing drug":

(A) Includes the off-label use of drugs
known to have abortion-inducing properties that are
prescribed or dispensed:

(I) Specifically with the intent of
causing an abortion, including mifepristone, misoprostol
and methotrexate;

(II) Without a diagnosed pregnancy for
the purpose of causing an abortion at some future date
rather than contemporaneously with a clinically diagnosed
pregnancy.

(B) Shall not include drugs that may be
known to cause an abortion but are prescribed for other
medical indications, provided that the medical indication
is clearly indicated on the prescription.

HB0117

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0445
(ii) "Abuser" means any person who attempts to,
conspires to or successfully coerces or forces a woman to
have an abortion;

(iii) "Chemical abortion" means the act of using
or prescribing any abortion-inducing drug with the intent
to terminate the pregnancy of a woman known or believed to
be pregnant with knowledge that the termination by those
means will, with reasonable likelihood, cause the death of
the unborn child. The use or prescription of an
abortion-inducing drug is not a chemical abortion if the
use or prescription is provided with the intent to:

(A) Save the life or preserve the health of
the unborn child;

(B) Remove a dead unborn child whose death
was caused by a miscarriage or stillbirth;

(C) Remove an ectopic pregnancy;

HB0117

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0445
(D) Treat a maternal disease or illness for
which the prescribed drug is medically indicated without
the intent to terminate the pregnancy; or

(E) Address a medical emergency.

(iv) "Coercing an abortion" or "forcing an
abortion" means a person who knows of or suspects the
pregnancy of a woman and engages or conspires with another
to engage in any one (1) or more of the following conduct
with the intent or purpose to cause or direct the pregnant
woman to have an abortion, regardless of whether the
abortion has been attempted or completed:

(v) "Coercion" means an action with purpose to
restrict a pregnant woman's freedom of action to her
detriment by engaging in conduct specified in paragraph
(iv) of this subsection;

(A) Committing, attempting to commit or
threatening to commit physical harm to the woman, unborn
child or another person;

HB0117

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0445
(B) Holding, attempting to hold or
threatening to hold in confinement the woman or unborn
child;

(C) Committing, attempting to commit or
threatening to commit against the woman any act prohibited
by the laws of this state;

(D) Revoking, attempting to revoke or
threatening to revoke a scholarship awarded to the woman by
a public or private institution of higher education;

(E) Discharging, attempting to discharge or
threatening to discharge the woman or another person or
changing, attempting to change or threatening to change the
woman's or another person's compensation, terms, conditions
or privileges of employment;

(F) Denying, attempting to deny or
threatening to deny any social assistance for which a
pregnant woman or another person has applied, has been
approved for or has been receiving for which the woman or
the other person is otherwise eligible;
HB0117

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0445

(G) Denying, removing or threatening to
deny or remove financial support or housing from the
pregnant woman or a dependent of the pregnant woman;

(H) Any other action intended to cause the
pregnant woman to have an abortion.

(vi) "Complication" means any adverse physical
or psychological condition arising from the performance of
an abortion that the board of medicine may define,
including but not limited to uterine perforation, cervical
perforation, infection, bleeding, hemorrhage, blood clots,
a failure to actually terminate the pregnancy, the
retention of tissue from an incomplete abortion, pelvic
inflammatory disease, endometritis, missed ectopic
pregnancy, cardiac arrest, respiratory arrest, renal
failure, metabolic disorder, shock, embolism, coma,
placenta previa in subsequent pregnancies, preterm birth in
subsequent pregnancies, free fluid in the abdomen, adverse
reactions to anesthesia and other drugs, any psychological
or emotional complications and any other adverse event as
HB0117

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0445
defined by the federal food and drug administration
criteria provided in the MedWatch reporting system;

(vii) "Elective abortion" means the use of an
instrument, medicine, drug or other substance or device,
including a chemical abortion, with the intent to terminate
the pregnancy of a woman known or believed to be pregnant.
"Elective abortion" shall not include medical procedures
performed to resolve a miscarriage, ectopic pregnancy or a
medical emergency;

(viii) "Fertilization" means the fecundation of
the ovum by the spermatozoa;

(ix) "Harm" means any complication, loss of
consortium with the unborn child or any financial loss
associated with an elective abortion or complication;

(x) "Informed consent" means, except in the case
of a medical emergency:

(A) The pregnant woman receives:

HB0117

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0445
(I) A written statement including:

(1) The name of the physician who
will perform the elective abortion;

(2) Medically accurate
information that a reasonable patient would consider
material to the decision of whether to undergo the elective
abortion, including:

a. Whether the pregnancy is
ectopic or molar;

b. A description of the
proposed abortion method;

c. The immediate and
long-term medical risks associated with the proposed
abortion method, including any potential complications;

d. Alternatives to the
abortion, including adoption and parenting.

HB0117

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0445
(3) The unborn child's probable
gestational age at the time the elective abortion is to be
performed;

(4) The unborn child's probable
anatomical and physiological characteristics at the time
the abortion is to be performed;

(5) The medical risks associated
with carrying the child to term; and

(6) Any need for anti-Rh immune
globulin therapy if the pregnant woman is Rh negative, the
likely consequences for refusing the therapy and the cost
of the therapy.

(II) A written explanation that:

(1) The pregnant woman is free to
withhold or withdraw her consent to the abortion at any
time without affecting:

HB0117

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0445
a. The pregnant woman's
right to future care and treatment; or

b. The status of any state
or federally funded benefits to which the pregnant woman
may otherwise be entitled.

(2) It is against the law for
anyone, regardless of that person's relationship to the
pregnant woman, to force or coerce the pregnant woman to
have an elective abortion; and

(3) No payment was required or
obtained for a service provided in relation to the elective
abortion until the elective abortion was performed.

(B) In the case of an abortion being
performed or induced utilizing abortion-inducing drugs, the
pregnant woman also receives a written statement of the
following:

(I) That mifepristone alone is not
always effective in ending a pregnancy;
HB0117

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0445

(II) If after taking mifepristone the
pregnant woman regrets her decision, she should consult a
physician or health care provider immediately to determine
if there are options available to assist her in continuing
her pregnancy but that time is of the essence.

(C) Not later than twenty-four (24) hours
before the performance or induction of an elective abortion
and after the pregnant woman has been provided all of the
information required under this paragraph, the pregnant
woman provides her informed written consent to the elective
abortion.

(xi) "Interested party" means a woman upon whom
an elective abortion is performed or attempted or, in the
case of the woman's:

(A) Death, the woman's spouse, personal
representative or, if unmarried, the biological father of
the unborn child or the woman's parent or guardian,
provided that no person found to be an abuser shall be an
interested party;
HB0117

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0445

(B) Incapacity, as determined by a court,
the woman's court-appointed guardian.

(xii) "Medical emergency" means a condition
that, based on the physician's reasonable medical judgment,
so complicates a pregnant woman's medical condition as to
necessitate the separation of the woman and her unborn
child to avert the woman's death or to avert a
delay-induced serious risk of substantial and irreversible
impairment of a major bodily function;

(xiii) "Physician" means a person licensed to
practice medicine in this state;

(xiv) "Pregnant" means the condition of a woman
carrying a fetus or embryo within her body;

(xv) "Reasonable medical judgment" means a
medical judgment that would be made by a reasonably prudent
physician who is knowledgeable about the case and the
treatment possibilities with respect to the medical
conditions involved;
HB0117

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0445

(xvi) "Unborn child" means an individual
organism of the species homo sapiens from fertilization
until live birth.

35-6-402. Elective abortions; civil liability;
requirements.

(a) Any interested party may bring a civil action
against any person who performs an elective abortion where
the interested party was harmed by the performance of an
elective abortion, and the pregnant woman:

(i) Did not voluntarily provide informed written
consent to the elective abortion;

(ii) Was coerced or forced into an elective
abortion, and the person who performed the elective
abortion knew or should have known of the coercion; or

(iii) Was harmed as a result of negligent,
reckless or intentional conduct associated with the
provision or induction of the elective abortion.
HB0117

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0445

(b) Upon prevailing in an action under subsection (a)
of this section, the court shall award the interested
party:

(i) Statutory damages of not less than
twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00) for each claim
brought by the interested party in which the interested
party prevailed;

(ii) Any compensatory damages determined by the
finder of fact and deemed reasonable by the court;

(iii) Costs and reasonable attorney fees.

(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section,
no damages shall be awarded in an action under this section
if the defendant demonstrates that the defendant previously
paid the full amount of statutory damages under paragraph
(b)(i) of this section in a previous action for that
elective abortion.

HB0117

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0445
(d) Nothing in this act shall be construed to
preclude or prohibit an interested party from:

(i) Bringing additional civil actions or claims
arising out of the same or similar circumstances that are
the basis for an action under this section;

(ii) Being awarded damages under a separate
cause of action or claim brought in accordance with law.

(e) Notwithstanding W.S. 1-3-105(a), an interested
party may bring an action under this section not later than
five (5) years after the date the cause of action accrues.

(f) The following shall not be a defense to an action
brought under this section:

(i) Ignorance or mistake of law;

(ii) A defendant's belief that the requirements
of this article are unconstitutional or were
unconstitutional;

HB0117

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0445
(iii) A defendant's reliance on any state or
federal court decision that is not binding on the court in
which the action is brought;

(iv) Nonmutual issue preclusion or nonmutual
claim preclusion; or

(v) Any claim that the enforcement of this
article or the imposition of civil liability against the
defendant will violate the constitutional rights of third
parties.

(g) This section shall not be construed to impose
liability on any speech or conduct protected by the first
amendment to the United States constitution or article 1,
section 20 of the Wyoming constitution.

(h) No court shall award attorney fees or costs to a
defendant in an action brought under this section.

(j) In each action brought under this section and
upon proper motion to the court, the court shall determine
whether the anonymity of any woman upon whom an abortion
HB0117

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0445
has been performed or induced shall be preserved from
public disclosure. Upon a finding that the anonymity of the
woman is necessary, the court shall issue appropriate
orders to safeguard the woman's identity and shall detail
the basis for the finding of the necessity of anonymity. An
order denying a motion under this subsection shall be
subject to an immediate interlocutory appeal. This section
shall not be construed to conceal the identity of the
plaintiff or of witnesses from the defendant or the
defendant's counsel.

(k) No woman upon whom the elective abortion is
performed or attempted shall be liable in an action brought
under this section.

35-6-403. Right of intervention.

The legislature, by joint resolution, may appoint one (1)
or more individuals who sponsored or cosponsored this act
to intervene as a matter of right in any case in which the
constitutionality of this article is challenged.

Section 3. W.S. 1-39-110(a) is amended to read:
HB0117

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0445

1-39-110. Liability; health care providers.

(a) A governmental entity is liable for damages
resulting from bodily injury, wrongful death or property
damage caused by the medical malpractice of health care
providers who are employees of the governmental entity,
including contract physicians, physician assistants,
nurses, optometrists and dentists who are providing a
service for state institutions or county jails, while
acting within the scope of their duties. For purposes of
this subsection, medical malpractice includes a violation
of W.S. 35-6-401 through 35-6-403.

Section 4. This act shall apply to all abortions
performed or induced on and after the effective date of
this act.

Section 5. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0117